src/fst/morphology/stems/adpositions.lexc
LEXICON adpositions
бердланьысь+Po:берд PO_APR_ELA  "" ; ! матыс петан
бердланьсянь+Po:берд PO_APR_EGR  "" ; ! матыс ылыстчан
боклань+Po:бок PO_APR  "" ;
бокланьын+Po:бок PO_APR_INE  "" ;
бокисянь+Po:боки PO_EGR  "" ;
бокиті+Po:бокиті PO_TRA  "ohitse" ;
бӧрвылысь+Po:бӧрвы PO_ELA_V/L  "" ;
бӧрысь+Po:бӧр PO_ELA  "" ;
бӧрын+Po:бӧр PO_INE  "" ;
бӧрсянь+Po:бӧр PO_EGR  "" ;
бӧрлань+Po:бӧр PO_APR  "" ;
бӧрӧдз+Po:бӧр PO_TER  "" ;
бӧрти+Po:бӧр PO_TRA  "" ;
бӧрӧд+Po:бӧр PO_PRL  "" ; !only this far in KKO 2000:444
бӧрланьын+Po:бӧр PO_APR_INE  "" ;
бӧрланьӧ+Po:бӧр PO_APR_ILL  "" ;
бӧрся+Po:бӧр PO_COMP  "jälkeen" ;
бӧртинас+Po:бӧртинас PO_TEMP_IS_TRA_INSTR_SG3  "" ;
бӧрвылӧ+Po:бӧрвыл PO_ILL  "" ;
бӧрвылысь+Po:бӧрвы PO_ELA_V/L  "" ;
веркыд+Po:веркыд POSTP1  "" ;
весьтысь+Po:весьт PO_ELA  "" ;
весьтын+Po:весьт PO_INE  "" ;
весьтсянь+Po:весьт PO_EGR  "" ;
весьтлань+Po:весьт PO_APR  "" ;
весьтӧдз+Po:весьт PO_TER  "" ;
водзвылысь+Po:водзвы PO_ELA_V/L  "" ;
водзӧ+Po:водз PO_ILL  "" ;
водзті+Po:водз PO_TRA  "" ;
водзӧд+Po:водз PO_PRL  "" ;
войдӧр+Po:войдӧр POSTP1  "" ;
вылысь+Po:вы PO_ELA_V/L  "" ;
вылын+Po:выл PO_INE  "" ;
вывсянь+Po:выв PO_EGR  "" ;
вывлань+Po:выв PO_APR  "" ;
вылӧдз+Po:выл PO_TER  "" ;
вывланьӧ+Po:выв PO_APR_ILL  "" ;
вывланьсянь+Po:выв PO_APR_EGR  "" ;
выйӧн+Po:вый PO_INS  "" ;
выя+Po:выя PO_NOM  "" ;
выяӧ+Po:выя PO_ILL  "" ;
выяысь+Po:выя PO_ELA  "" ;
выяӧдз+Po:выя PO_TER  "" ;
выяті+Po:выя PO_TRA  "" ;
вӧсна+Po:вӧсна PO_PX  "takia" ;
горув+Po:горул PO_SPAT_  "" ;
гырся+Po:гыр PO_COMP  "" ;
гӧгӧр+Po:гӧгӧр PO_NOM  "" ;
гӧгӧрӧд+Po:гӧгӧр PO_PRL  "" ;
дінын+Po:дін PO_INE  "" ;
дінсянь+Po:дін PO_EGR  "" ;
дінлань+Po:дін PO_APR  "" ;
дор+Po:дор PO_NOM  "" ;
дорӧд+Po:дор PO_PRL  "" ;
дорланьын+Po:дор PO_APR_INE  "" ;
дорланьысь+Po:дор PO_APR_ELA  "" ;
дорланьсянь+Po:дор PO_APR_EGR  "" ;
дырйи+Po:дырйи PO_PX  "aikana" ;
йылӧ+Po:йыл PO_ILL  "" ;
йылысь+Po:йы PO_ELA_V/L  "-stA" ;
йывсянь+Po:йыл PO_EGR  "" ;
йывлань+Po:йыл PO_APR  "" ;
йылӧдз+Po:йыл PO_TER  "" ;
йывті+Po:йыв PO_TRA  "" ;
йывланьын+Po:йыв PO_APR_INE  "" ;
йывланьысь+Po:йыв PO_APR_ELA  "" ;
йывланьсянь+Po:йыв PO_APR_EGR  "" ;
кабыра+Po:кабыра PoNTag  "" ;
катыдын+Po:катыд PO_INE  "" ;
кежысь+Po:кеж PO_ELA  "" ;
кодь+Po:кодь PO_PX  "" ;
кодься+Po:кодься PoATag  "" ;
костӧд+Po:кост PO_PRL  "" ;
кузяла+Po:кузяла POSTP_ "" ;
кымын+Po:кымын PO_PX  "" ;
моз+Po:моз PO_PX  "niin kuin" ;
мысти+Po:мысти PO_PX  "kuluttua" ;
мӧдлапӧв+Po:мӧдлапӧл POSTP1  "" ;
мышкӧ+Po:мышк PO_ILL  "" ;
мышкысь+Po:мыш PO_ELA_0/K  "" ;
мышланьӧ+Po:мыш PO_APR_ILL  "" ;
ног+Po:ног POSTP_ "-ttain" ;
нога+Po:нога PoATag  "" ;
ногӧн+Po:ног PO_INS  "" ;
ньылыд+Po:ньылыд POSTP_ "pitkin" ;
ордын+Po:орд PO_INE  "" ;
ортсыысь+Po:ортсы PO_ELA  "" ;
паныд+Po:паныд POSTP_ "vasten" ;
паныдӧн+Po:паныдӧн POSTP1  "vastapäätä" ;
пасьтала+Po:пасьтала PO_NOM  "ympäri" ;
пи+Po:пи POSTP1  "joukossa" ;
пиӧ+Po:пи PO_ILL  "" ;
писянь+Po:пи PO_EGR  "" ;
пиӧдз+Po:пи PO_TER  "" ;
помысь+Po:пом PO_ELA  "" ;
помӧд+Po:пом PO_PRL  "" ;
помланьысь+Po:пом PO_APR_ELA  "" ;
помланьӧ+Po:пом PO_APR_ILL  "" ;
помланьын+Po:пом PO_APR_INE  "" ;
помланьсянь+Po:пом PO_APR_EGR  "" ;
помланьӧд+Po:пом PO_APR_PRL  "" ;
помланьӧдз+Po:пом PO_APR_TER  "" ;
пуджыд+Po:пуджыд PO_PX  "" ;
пыдди+Po:пыдди POSTP_  "asemesta" ;
пырся+Po:пыр PO_COMP  "" ;
пытшкысь+Po:пытш PO_ELA_0/K ;
пытшсянь+Po:пытш PO_EGR ;
пытшлань+Po:пытш PO_APR ;
пытшті+Po:пытш PO_TRA ;
пытшланьын+Po:пытш PO_APR_INE ;
пытшланьысь+Po:пытш PO_APR_ELA ;
пытшланьӧ+Po:пытш PO_APR_ILL ;
пӧлӧн+Po:пӧлӧн PO_NOM "pitkin" ;
пӧлӧн+Po+Pl:пӧлӧнъяс PO_NOM "pitkin" ;
пӧлӧнӧ+Po:пӧлӧн PO_ILL "" ;
пӧлӧнӧн+Po:пӧлӧн PO_INS "" ;
пӧлӧнын+Po:пӧлӧн PO_INE "" ;
пӧлӧнӧд+Po+Pl:пӧлӧнъяс PO_PRL "" ;
ради+Po:ради PO_PX  "" ;
сайысь+Po:сай PO_ELA  "" ;
сайӧдз+Po:сай PO_TER  "" ;
сайті+Po:сай PO_TRA  "" ;
сайланьын+Po:сай PO_APR_INE  "" ;
сорӧн+Po:сор PO_INS  "" ;
суда+Po:суда POSTP_  "" ;
сямӧн+Po:сям PO_INS  "" ;
туйӧ+Po:туй PO_ILL  "" ;
туйӧн+Po:туй PO_INS  "" ;
улысь+Po:у PO_ELA_V/L  "" ;
увсянь+Po:ув PO_EGR  "" ;
увлань+Po:ув PO_APR  "" ;
увланьысь+Po:ув PO_APR_ELA  "" ;
увланьӧ+Po:ув PO_APR_ILL  "" ;
увланьын+Po:ув PO_APR_INE  "" ;
увланьті+Po:ув PO_APR_TRA  "" ;
уліӧд+Po:улі PO_PRL  "" ;
чӧж+Po:чӧж POSTP_NOUN  "jnk kuluessa" ;
чӧжӧн+Po:чӧж PO_INS  "" ;
шогысь+Po:шӧр PO_ELA  "" ;
шӧрын+Po:шӧр PO_INE  "" ;
шӧрлань+Po:шӧр PO_APR  "" ;
шӧрӧдз+Po:шӧр PO_TER  "" ;
шӧрланьысь+Po:шӧр PO_APR_ELA  "" ;
шӧрланьӧ+Po:шӧр PO_APR_ILL  "" ;
шӧрвыйті+Po:шӧрвый PO_TRA  "" ;
шӧрвыйланьын+Po:шӧрвый PO_APR_INE  "" ;
шӧрвыйӧн+Po:шӧрвый PO_INS  "" ;
ылӧс+Po:ылӧс POSTP_  "" ;
ылӧс+Po:ылӧс POSTP1  "" ;
ӧтдор+Po:ӧтдор POSTP1  "paitsi" ;
